Washington statutes.
RCW 15.80.490

Weigher's license—Employees or agents to issue weight tickets—Application—Fee.

(1) Any weighmaster must file an application with the director for a license for any employee or agent to operate and issue certified weight tickets from each scale which such weighmaster is licensed to operate under the provisions of this chapter. Such application shall be submitted on a form prescribed by the director and shall contain the following:

(a) The name of the weighmaster;

(b) The full name of the employee or agent; and

(c) The scale from which such employee or agent will issue certified weights.

(2) Such annual application shall be accompanied by a license fee of twenty dollars.

[ 2017 c 158 s 6; 2010 c 8 s 6105; 2006 c 358 s 4; 1969 ex.s. c 100 s 20.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2006 c 358: See note following RCW 19.94.175.